Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-122
Domestic company; stock reduction; procedure.

No reduction of stock shall be made except by approval of at least two-thirds of the directors. The directors, after such reduction of stock, may require such shareholder to surrender his or her stock and in lieu thereof may issue a new certificate for such number of shares as each shall be entitled to.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 9, p. 400;

R.S.1913, § 3145;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 2, p. 578;

C.S.1922, § 7746;

C.S.1929, § 44-202;

R.S.1943, § 44-122;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 259, § 1.